Florida, session 2026, SB7020.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 597.0042, Florida 13 Statutes, is amended to read: 14 597.0042âPublic records exemptions; aquaculture records.â 15 (4)âThis section is subject to the Open Government Sunset 16 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 17 on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 18 through reenactment by the Legislature. 19 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.